Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-501
Building, defined.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires, building shall mean a structure which has the capacity to contain, and is designed for the shelter of man, animals, or property, and includes ships, trailers, sleeping cars, aircraft, or other vehicles or places adapted for overnight accommodations of persons or animals, or for carrying on of business therein, whether or not a person or animal is actually present. If a building is divided into units for separate occupancy, any unit not occupied by the defendant is a building of another.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 100.